Massachusetts, session 194th, S93.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 334 of the acts of 2016 is hereby amended, in section
2, by inserting the following at the end thereof:
One percent of the tax imposed under this section shall be deposited into the Prevention
and Wellness Trust Fund for the cost of evidence-based public health programs dedicated to
primary prevention of youth substance use.
of 1